Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-922
Tampering with physical evidence; penalty; physical evidence, defined.

(1) A person commits the offense of tampering with physical evidence if, believing that an official proceeding is pending or about to be instituted and acting without legal right or authority, he or she:

(a) Destroys, mutilates, conceals, removes, or alters physical evidence with the intent to impair its verity or availability in the pending or prospective official proceeding; or

(b) Knowingly makes, presents, or offers any false physical evidence with intent that it be introduced in the pending or prospective official proceeding.

(2) Physical evidence, as used in this section, shall mean any article, object, document, record, or other thing of physical substance.

(3) Tampering with physical evidence is a Class IV felony, except that if such offense involves a pending criminal proceeding which alleges a violation of another offense classified:

(a) As a Class II misdemeanor or a lower classification or a violation of a city or village ordinance, the offense is a Class I misdemeanor; or

(b) As a Class II felony or a higher classification, the offense is a Class II felony.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 207;

Laws 2019, LB496, § 3.

The crime of tampering with physical evidence, as defined by subdivision (1)(a) of this section, does not include mere abandonment of physical evidence in the presence of law enforcement. State v. Lasu, 278 Neb. 180, 768 N.W.2d 447 (2009).

To conceal or remove physical evidence, within the meaning of subdivision (1)(a) of this section, is to act in a way that will prevent it from being disclosed or recognized. State v. Lasu, 278 Neb. 180, 768 N.W.2d 447 (2009).